Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The amounts authorized,  as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state during the 2021-2023 biennium are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Eastern Oregon University,
Inlow Hall Renovation,
Phase II ..........................................$ 600,000
(b) Oregon State University:
(A) Cascades Student
Success Center .............................. $ 5,105,000
(B) Cordley Hall Renovation,
Phase II ..........................................$ 25,375,000
(c) Portland State University,
Gateway Center Reuse and
Extension .......................................$ 5,105,000
(d) University of Oregon,
[Heritage Building Renovation ]
Heritage Buildings Renovation
(University and Villard
Halls)..............................................$ 5,960,000
(e) Western Oregon University,
Student Success Center .............. $ 695,000
(f) Blue Mountain Community
College, Facility for
Agricultural Resource
Management .................................. $ 6,615,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 1
(g) Central Oregon Community
College, Classroom Building
Redmond Campus ......................... $ 8,125,000
(h) Chemeketa Community
College, Building 7 Remodel ..... $ 8,125,000
(i) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building ........ $ 8,120,000
(j) Klamath Community College,
Childcare Resource Learning
Center .............................................$ 1,540,000
(k) Linn-Benton Community
College, Agricultural Center ..... $ 8,125,000
(L) Mt. Hood Community College,
Accessibility Upgrades,
Dental Hygiene Lab and
Deferred Maintenance ................ $ 8,125,000
(m) Oregon Coast Community
College, Workforce Education
and Resiliency Center ................. $ 8,125,000
(n) Rogue Community College,
Transportation Technology
Center .............................................$ 7,120,000
(o) Tillamook Bay Community
College, Classroom and
Office Building and
Renovations ................................... $ 8,125,000
(p) Treasure Valley Community
College, Nursing-Allied
Health Professions Center ......... $ 5,015,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,300,000 
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) .............. $ 111,300,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ............... $ 50,750,000
(5) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ......................................$ 126,090,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Department of Revenue,
Electronic Valuation
[Information System ..................... $ 4,245,000]
Information System .............. $ 3,810,000
(b) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Ashland Armory Service
Life Extension ............................... $ 5,480,000
(B) Corvallis Armory Service
Life Extension ............................... $ 4,375,000
(C) Resiliency Grant Fund
established under
[ORS 401.552 ................................. $ 10,210,000]
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 2
ORS 401.552........................... $ 5,105,000
(D) Washington County
Readiness Center.......................... $ 5,410,000
(c) Oregon State Police:
(A) Central Point Office
Expansion .......................................$ 34,435,000
(B) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office ......... $ 62,710,000
(C) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office ........................... $ 14,490,000
(d) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvement and
Renewal ..........................................$ 70,745,000
(B) Electronic Health Records ......... $ 13,635,000
(C) Off-Net Telephone
Infrastructure ................................ $ 3,825,000
(e) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Camp Riverbend Dorm
Renovation ..................................... $ 6,975,000
(B) Capital Improvements ................. $ 11,060,000
(C) Control Room Renovations ........ $ 1,300,000
(D) JJIS IT System
Modernization ............................... $ 7,870,000
(E) MacLaren Infirmary and
Pharmacy Renovation ................. $ 1,720,000
(F) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations ................................... $ 20,795,000
(G) Oak Creek Medical and
Dental Clinic Renovations ......... $ 710,000
(H) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ................................ $ 7,110,000
(I) Tillamook Dorm Renovation ...... $ 10,495,000
(J) Tillamook Medical and
Dental Renovations ..................... $ 690,000
(f) Oregon Health Authority:
(A) OSH Salem Well Water
Treatment Facility ....................... $ 4,555,000
(B) OSH Salem/Junction City
Automated Dispensing
Cabinets..........................................$ 3,555,000
(g) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
[Improvement and Renewal ........ $ 80,810,000]
Improvement and Renewal ... $ 110,995,000
(B) Eastern Oregon University,
Inlow Hall Renovation,
Phase II ..........................................$ 17,920,000
(C) Oregon Institute of
Technology, OMIC R&D Center
for Additive Manufacturing
Innovation, Phase II .................... $  5,105,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 3
(D) Oregon State University:
(i) Cascades Student Success
Center .............................................$ 8,930,000
(ii) Cordley Hall Renovation,
Phase II ..........................................$ 61,690,000
(E) Portland State University,
Gateway Center Reuse and
Extension .......................................$ 45,585,000
(F) University of Oregon,
[Heritage Building Renovation ]
Heritage Buildings Renovation
(University and Villard
Halls)..............................................$ 53,285,000
(G) Western Oregon University,
Student Success Center .............. $ 20,920,000
(H) FAMIS System Replacement ..... $ 5,105,000
(h) Department of Education:
(A) Oregon School for the Deaf
ADA Restrooms ............................ $ 1,065,000
(B) Oregon School for the Deaf
Fire Alarm System
Replacement .................................. $ 3,145,000
(C) Oregon School for the Deaf
Windows Upgrade ........................ $ 1,425,000
(i) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ................. $ 2,464,209
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement
Phase II ..........................................$ 1,136,227
(j) State Parks and Recreation
Department, Capital
Improvement and Renewal ......... $ 50,750,000
(k) Oregon Department of
Fish and Wildlife,
Capital Improvement
and Renewal .................................. $ 5,105,000
(L) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Housing and
Permanent Supportive
Housing...........................................$ 413,490,000
(m) Judicial Department:
(A) Benton County Courthouse ........ $ 20,730,000
(B) Clackamas County
Courthouse ..................................... $ 95,400,000
(C) [Crook County Courthouse .......... $ 11,885,000]
Crook County Courthouse..... $ 16,330,000
(D) Linn County Courthouse ............ $ 16,110,000
(E) Supreme Court Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 21,950,000
(n) Legislative Administration
Committee[,]:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 4
(A) Document Publishing
and Management System ............ $  4,310,000
(B) Capitol Accessibility,
Maintenance, and Safety
Phase III ............................... $ 19,865,000
(o) Oregon Department of
Emergency Management,
Resiliency Grant Fund
established under
ORS 401.552........................... $ 5,105,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(7) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ........................ $ 180,000,000
(8) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,000,000
(9) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ................................... $ 50,000,000
(10) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Oregon Institute of
Technology, New Residence
Hall Facility .................................. $ 55,650,000
(b) Oregon State University,
Reser Stadium West
Grandstands................................... $ 40,555,000
(c) Portland State University,
Gateway Center Reuse
and Extension .............................. $ 18,300,000
(11) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Executive Building Interior
and Seismic Renovation .............. $ 45,620,000
(b) Justice Building Exterior
Renovations ................................... $ 3,555,000
(c) North Valley Complex
Infrastructure Upgrades/
[Tenant Improvements .................. $ 60,820,000]
Tenant Improvements ........... $ 74,015,000
(d) Portland State Office
Building Improvements ............... $ 8,730,000
(e) Revenue Building Electrical
System Upgrades .......................... $ 7,120,000
(f) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ....... $ 4,055,000
(g) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ................. $ 2,420,791
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase II ..........................................$ 1,578,773
(h) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
(A) Liquor Warehouse Conveyor
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 5
[System............................................$ 10,175,000]
System .................................. $ 15,205,000
(B) Liquor Warehouse Land
[and Building ................................ $ 53,170,000]
and Building.......................... $ 131,880,000
(C) Liquor Warehouse
[Management IT System .............. $ 27,390,000]
Management IT System ........ $ 27,360,000
(i) Department of Justice,
Legal Tools Replacement
Project 3.0 ............................. $ 5,105,000
Total General Obligation
[Bonds .............................................$ 2,252,290,200]
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,408,360,000
SECTION 2.  Section 2, chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The amounts  authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of revenue bonds
of the state during the 2021-2023 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
Services Department ................... $ 500,000,000
Department of
Transportation .............................. $ 880,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department .................................... $ 30,000,000 
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
[Lottery Revenue Bonds .............. $ 492,440,000]
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 515,510,000
Total Direct Revenue
[Bonds .............................................$ 1,902,440,000]
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,925,510,000
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds ..................... $ 600,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ..........................................$ 2,500,000
Oregon Facilities Authority ...... $ 1,000,000,000
Housing and Community
Services Department ................... $ 1,300,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
Bonds ..............................................$ 2,902,500,000
[Total Revenue Bonds .................. $ 4,804,940,000]
Total Revenue Bonds ............ $ 4,828,010,000
SECTION 3.  Section 4, chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) For calendar year 2022, the amount of [ $442,862,385] $467,077,050 is allocated for
private activity bonds, as provided in ORS 286A.615, as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 6
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds ..................... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ..........................................$ 1,000,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ................... $ 250,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
[Committee......................................$ 151,862,385]
Committee............................. $ 176,077,050
(2) For calendar year 2023, the amount of  [ $442,862,385] $467,077,050 is allocated for private
activity bonds, as provided in ORS 286A.615, as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds ..................... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ..........................................$ 1,000,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ................... $ 250,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
[Committee......................................$ 151,862,385]
Committee............................. $ 176,077,050
(3) If an  increase in this state’s population, a sufficient increase in the Consumer Price Index
or a change in federal law allows the private activity bond limit as set by  the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, to exceed [ $442,862,385] $467,077,050 during the 2022 calendar year or
[$442,862,385] $467,077,050 during the  2023 calendar year, the increase is allocated to the Private
Activity Bond Committee.
SECTION 4.
 Section 7, chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) Out of the amount specified in  section 1 (6)(m)(A) [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 658,
Oregon Laws 2021,  the State Treasurer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in  an amount not to exceed
$20,383,129 of net proceeds for the purposes and in the manner specified in section 8, chapter 705,
Oregon Laws 2013, plus an amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related
costs.
(2) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(m)(B) [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter  658, Oregon
Laws 2021,  the State  Treasurer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed
$94,500,000 of net proceeds for the purposes and in the manner specified in section 8, chapter 705,
Oregon Laws 2013, plus an amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related
costs.
(3) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(m)(C) [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 658, Oregon
Laws 2021, the State  Treasurer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed
[$11,700,000] $16,116,705 of net proceeds  for the purposes and in the manner specified in section 8,
chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus an  amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated
bond-related costs.
(4) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(m)(D) [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 658, Oregon
Laws 2021,  the State  Treasurer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed
$15,900,000 of net proceeds for the purposes and in the manner specified in section 8, chapter 705,
Oregon Laws 2013, plus an amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related
costs.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 7
(5) For purposes of sections 8 and 9, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013,  and section 64, chapter
723, Oregon Laws 2013, bonds issued pursuant to  this section are considered to be bonds issued
pursuant to section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013.
(6) Bonds may not be issued pursuant to section 1 (6)(m)(A), (B), (C) or (D) [ of this 2021 Act ],
chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021,  except as provided in this section.
SECTION 5.  Section 8, chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 8. (1) From the net proceeds of bonds issued under section 1 (6)(b)(C)  [ of this 2021 Act ],
chapter 658, Oregon Laws  2021, the Office of Emergency Management may expend a maximum of
[$2,000,000] $1,000,000 for urban search and rescue preparedness equipment.
(2) From the net proceeds  of bonds issued under section 1 (6)(o), chapter 658, Oregon
Laws 2021, the Oregon  Department of Emergency Management may expend a maximum of
$1,000,000 for urban search and rescue preparedness equipment.
SECTION 6.  Section 10, chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  (1) A public university that is carrying out a qualified project shall require each con-
tractor in a contract with an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater to:
(a) Employ apprentices to perform 15 percent of the work hours that workers  in apprenticeable
occupations perform under the contract, in a manner consistent with the  apprentices’ respective
apprenticeship training programs;
(b) Establish and execute a plan for  outreach, recruitment and retention of women, minority
individuals and veterans to perform work under the contract,  with the aspirational target of having
at least 15 percent of total work hours performed by individuals in one or more of those groups;
(c) Provide health insurance and retirement benefits to workers; and
(d) Require any subcontractor engaged by the contractor  to abide by the requirements set forth
in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if the  work to be performed under the subcontract
has an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater.
(2) On or before February 1  of each year, each public university that is carrying out a qualified
project shall report to  the Joint Committee on Ways and Means or Joint Interim Committee on
Ways and Means, as part of the report required under ORS 350.379, on:
(a) The amount of work performed on qualified projects by apprentices;
(b) The amount  of work performed on qualified projects by women, minority individuals and
veterans; and
(c) The types and costs of health insurance  and retirement benefits provided to workers by
contractors and subcontractors.
(3) The requirements of this section are in addition  to, and not in lieu of, the requirements im-
posed under ORS 350.379.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship  training program” means the total system of apprenticeship that a particular
local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010,  operates, including the local joint committee’s
registered standards and all other terms and conditions for qualifying,  recruiting, selecting, em-
ploying and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(e) “Qualified project” means the following capital construction projects:
(A) The Eastern Oregon University Inlow Hall Renovation, Phase II referenced  in section 1
(1)(a) [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021 ;
(B) The Oregon State University Cascades Student  Success Center referenced in section 1
(1)(b)(A) [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021 ;
(C) The Oregon  State University Cordley Hall Renovation, Phase II referenced in section 1
(1)(b)(B) [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021 ;
(D) The Portland State University Gateway Center Reuse and  Extension referenced in section
1 (1)(c) [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021 ;
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 8
(E) The University of Oregon Heritage [ Building] Buildings  Renovation (University and
Villard Halls) referenced in section 1 (1)(d) [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 658, Oregon Laws  2021; and
(F) The Western Oregon University Student Success Center referenced in section  1 (1)(e) [ of this
2021 Act ], chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2021 .
(f) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(g) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 7.
 Section 39, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, as  amended by section 18, chapter 682,
Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 39. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the Department of Veterans’  Affairs,
the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in
an amount that produces $6 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection  (2) of
this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State  Treasurer to be necessary to pay
bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section  must be transferred to the Depart-
ment of Veterans’ Affairs for deposit  in the Veterans’ Affordable Housing Fund, established in sec-
tion 40, chapter  671, Oregon Laws 2019, for distribution to Salem Y Veterans Housing to construct
veterans’ affordable housing in Salem , which may include the acquisition  of land for veterans’
affordable housing.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Having housing for at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic growth.
(b) A severe shortage of affordable housing exists in Oregon, and market  indicators demonstrate
a growing gap between the supply of and the demand for affordable housing.
SECTION 8.
(1) For the biennium ending June 30, 2023, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the McKenzie
River Discovery Center, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3 million  in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to  the McKenzie River Discovery Center to construct a
central exhibition structure and undertake site improvements at the site  of the Historic Old
Leaburg Fish Hatchery.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
the central  exhibition structure and site improvements will enhance the economic viability
of the region through increased tourism, job creation and improved  quality of life for the
community.
SECTION 9.
(1) For the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the City of
Portland Parks and Recreation, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $15 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553  for distribution to the City of Portland Parks and Recreation for the
construction of a new aquatic center in North Portland.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 9
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to recreation services will enhance the economic  viability of the region,
create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 10. (1) For  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the City of
Milton-Freewater, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution  to City of Milton-Freewater for construction of the Police
and Dispatch Station to relocate the current station from the basement of City Hall.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
emergency services are necessary components  of a climate that facilitates and encourages
economic development.
SECTION 11. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 10